District of Columbia statutes.
3-1357

Repealed

Payments into Fund.

Repealed.

July 18, 2008, D.C. Law 17-197, § 8, 55 DCR 6277
Aug. 16, 2008, D.C. Law 17-219, § 3018, 55 DCR 7598
June 19, 2013, D.C. Law 19-320, § 503(b), 60 DCR 3390
D.C. Law 17-219, in par. (2), inserted “The maximum amount of fines deposited into the Fund from this paragraph shall be $275,000 in fiscal year 2009, $750,000 in fiscal year 2010, $1 million in fiscal year 2011, and increased annually, beginning in fiscal year 2012, by 5%.”
For temporary repeal of section, see § 503(b) of the Omnibus Criminal Code Amendments Emergency Amendment Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-599, January 14, 2013, 60 DCR 1017).
For temporary (90 days) repeal of this section, see § 503(b) of the Omnibus Criminal Code Amendment Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-44, April 1, 2013, 60 DCR 5381, 20 DCSTAT 1281).
Short title: Section 3017 of D.C. Law 17-219 provided that subtitle H of title III of the act may be cited as the “Motor Vehicle Theft Prevention Commission Annual Maximum Appropriations Amendment Act of 2008”.